Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5301YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2166 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 49.106 Records preserved. 1 1. Within sixty days of the conclusion of each election, 2 the state commissioner of elections shall create a record 3 containing all information in the statewide voter registration 4 database at the time of the election for each voter who voted 5 in the election, organized by county. The state commissioner 6 of elections shall maintain this record for eight years. 7 2. A record created pursuant to this section shall be made 8 available in an electronic format at no cost upon request, 9 except that if the record is too large to be transmitted 10 electronically, the requester shall provide a device to store 11 the record. 12